Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1055XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1055XD (3) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 815.9, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, chapters 13B, 229A, 232, 665,
812, 814, and 822, and section sections 811.1A and 821A.1, and
the rules of criminal procedure, a person is indigent if the
person is entitled to an attorney appointed by the court as
follows:
Sec. 2. NEW SECTION. 821A.1 Defense subpoenas in criminal
actions.
1. a. A criminal defendant or counsel acting on the
defendant’s behalf shall not issue any subpoena for documents
or other evidence except upon application to the court. An
application shall not be granted unless a defendant proves by a
preponderance of the evidence all of the following:
(1) There is a compelling need for the evidence sought and
that such evidence is material, necessary, exculpatory, and
admissible at trial.
(2) The evidence sought does not include the private
information of a crime victim or any other person except for
the defendant’s own private information.
b. For the purposes of this subsection:
(1) “Exculpatory” means information that tends to negate the
guilt of the defendant and not information that is unrelated to
the case and is merely impeaching or substantially cumulative
in nature.
(2) “Private information” means information immaterial to
the case for which a person has a reasonable expectation of
privacy including but not limited to information the state
would need a search warrant to obtain, nonpublic electronic
communications, and information that would reveal personal
information not related to the case.
2. Notwithstanding any rule of criminal procedure
concerning the issuance of a subpoena, this section is the
exclusive mechanism for a criminal defendant or counsel acting
on the defendant’s behalf to issue a subpoena for documents or
LSB 1055XD (3) 91
-1- as/js 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
other evidence.
3. An application for a defense subpoena shall not be filed
or reviewed ex parte.
4. The prosecuting attorney shall not be required to execute
or effectuate any order or subpoena issued pursuant to this
section.
5. A crime victim or other party who is the subject of
a subpoena shall not be required by the court to execute a
waiver.
6. Upon application by a crime victim or the prosecuting
attorney, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent a
person or entity served with a defense subpoena if the person
or entity is determined to be indigent pursuant to section
815.9. Counsel appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be
paid from the indigent defense fund established pursuant to
section 815.11.
7. Documents or other evidence obtained through a defense
subpoena must be provided to the prosecuting attorney within
five business days after the receipt of the documents or other
evidence.
8. Documents or other evidence obtained through a defense
subpoena that does not comply with this section shall not be
admissible in any criminal action if offered by the defendant.
9. The court may sanction an attorney for knowingly issuing
a defense subpoena in violation of this section.
10. An applicant for postconviction relief shall not be
entitled to relief on a claim of ineffective assistance of
counsel when that claim is predicated upon evidence that
was obtained through a defense subpoena and required to be
disclosed pursuant to this section.